Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.380

Office of the education ombuds—Notification.

RCW 28A.600.510 (1) and (2), related to provision of information about the office of the education ombuds, governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and apply to charter schools established under this chapter.

[ 2022 c 222 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—2022 c 222: See note following RCW 28A.600.510.